New York, session 2025-2026, S9030.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 204 to 2 read as follows: 3 § 204. New York state child care expansion program. 1. For the 4 purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the following 5 meanings: 6 (a) "Child day care center" shall have the same meaning as defined by 7 section three hundred ninety of the social services law. 8 (b) "State agency" means any department, division, bureau, commission, 9 agency, office, board or other subunit of any public authority, the 10 executive, the judiciary, or the legislature. 11 (c) "State office" means any office building or facility in the state 12 wherein one hundred or more employees, in aggregate, of a state agency 13 are located, whether or not such office building or facility is owned, 14 rented, or leased by the state. 15 2. There shall be created within the office of general services a "New 16 York state child care expansion program". The purpose of such program 17 shall be to assist state agencies with establishing a physical location 18 whereby each state office shall allow a public or private child day care 19 center to operate within such state office. Such program shall require 20 within the contractual agreement with a public or private child day care 21 center, an acceptance lottery system with first preference given to 22 state employees employed in the same state office as such child day care 23 center, and any remaining available spots offered to the general public. 24 3. Each state office, with assistance from the New York state child 25 care expansion program, shall designate a room or rooms as dedicated 26 child care space whereby such state office shall allow a public or 27 private child day care center to operate. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14591-01-6 S. 9030 2 1 4. The office of general services shall be responsible for developing 2 a state strategy which shall determine how best to locate and designate 3 any room or rooms within state offices for operation of a child day care 4 center pursuant to this section. In developing such strategy, the office 5 of general services shall consider such factors as: the cost at which 6 child day care center will lease such room or rooms; the number of chil- 7 dren such designated room or rooms can accommodate; and any other 8 factors deemed necessary. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.